lexd_components/hyx-added_kayayan.lexd
# Words from Kogian dictionary
# Յարութիւն Թ. Գայայեան, Բառարան Գանձարան Հայերէն Լեզուի. Գահիրէ: Տպագրութիւն Գալֆա (1938)
# http://www.nayiri.com/imagedDictionaryBrowser.jsp?dictionaryId=10&dt=HY_HY

LEXICON AdjReg
յարձակող:յարձակող
կտրող:կտրող
տեւող:տեւող
նետող:նետող
ուրացող:ուրացող
պահանջող:պահանջող
պրպտող:պրպտող
կապող:կապող
հոլանի:հոլանի
բուսակեր:բուսակեր
մսակեր:մսակեր
քաջալեր:քաջալեր
երկճղի:երկճղի
անդուռն:անդուռն
տանելի:տանելի
թեւանցիկ:թեւանցիկ
ծանրաքայլ:ծանրաքայլ
կամացուկ:կամացուկ
միաձայն:միաձայն
բազկատարած:բազկատարած
գաղտագողի:գաղտագողի
յառաջագոյն:յառաջագոյն
յուշիկ:յուշիկ
վարկպարազի:վարկպարազի
ագուցիկ:ագուցիկ
անապատ:անապատ
անձնագով:անձնագով
անուանական:անուանական
ապագայ:ապագայ
արբեցած:արբեցած
զարմացած:զարմացած
թափանցող:թափանցող
պլպլացող:պլպլացող
սեւեռած:սեւեռած
քաշելիք:քաշելիք
կրտած:կրտած
հասկացող:հասկացող
պաշտպանող:պաշտպանող
փափաքող:փափաքող
ասեղնագործ:ասեղնագործ
արբեցուցիչ:արբեցուցիչ
արջամագիլ:արջամագիլ
աւետաւոր:աւետաւոր
խաշած:խաշած
այրող:այրող
բաղկացուցիչ:բաղկացուցիչ
բանգէտ:բանգէտ
սառն:սառն
ծծկեր:ծծկեր
բարակ:բարակ
բարեգուշակ:բարեգուշակ
բիլ:բիլ
բրածոյ:բրածոյ
գաղթական:գաղթական
գելաթիւր:գելաթիւր
գիշերաշրջիկ:գիշերաշրջիկ
գիտակ:գիտակ
գոնջ:գոնջ
գոռ:գոռ
դատարկաձեռն:դատարկաձեռն
դատարկաշրջիկ:դատարկաշրջիկ
դերձակ:դերձակ
դրամաշորթ:դրամաշորթ
եռանկիւն:եռանկիւն
եռօրեայ:եռօրեայ
երաշխ:երաշխ
երիցական:երիցական
երկժանի:երկժանի
երկիլիոն:երկիլիոն
երկոտասնեակ:երկոտասնեակ
եփուկ:եփուկ
զարթօնք:զարթօնք
զրաբան:զրաբան
ընդդիմախօս:ընդդիմախօս
թագաւորանիստ:թագաւորանիստ
թաղանթոտն:թաղանթոտն
թելադիր:թելադիր
թովիչ:թովիչ
թուահամար:թուահամար
ժուռ:ժուռ
իգամոլ:իգամոլ
ինքնավար:ինքնավար
լազուարթ:լազուարթ
լիսեռն:լիսեռն
լոշի:լոշի
լրաբեր:լրաբեր
լօրիկ:լօրիկ
խազմարար:խազմարար
խաղադրուժ:խաղադրուժ
խաղաղարար:խաղաղարար
խամդաստ:խամդաստ
խարտոց:խարտոց
խենթուկ:խենթուկ
խեցեղէն:խեցեղէն
խնամատար:խնամատար
խնդբունդ:խնդբունդ
խորափիտ:խորափիտ
խորհրդածու:խորհրդածու
խռովարկու:խռովարկու
ծերագոյն:ծերագոյն
կաթնտու:կաթնտու
կանամբի:կանամբի
կարգադիր:կարգադիր
կարմրուկ:կարմրուկ
կեղծապարիշտ:կեղծապարիշտ
կոկոզ:կոկոզ
կտրատ:կտրատ
կրօնակից:կրօնակից
հակամարտ:հակամարտ
համաշխարհիկ:համաշխարհիկ
համարժէք:համարժէք
համբոյր:համբոյր
հանրագիտարան:հանրագիտարան
հաւատուրաց:հաւատուրաց
հրաշակերտ:հրաշակերտ
ճարտարախօս:ճարտարախօս
մախազ:մախազ
մանկամարդ:մանկամարդ
մխիթարեան:մխիթարեան
յոխորտաբան:յոխորտաբան
յորդորանք:յորդորանք
նահատակ:նահատակ
նպաստընկալ:նպաստընկալ
շահադէտ:շահադէտ
շարժիչ:շարժիչ
շոգեշարժ:շոգեշարժ
շողոմ:շողոմ
ուլնագել:ուլնագել
ուշաբարձ:ուշաբարձ
ուռական:ուռական
չպիտոյ:չպիտոյ
պատեհապաշտ:պատեհապաշտ
պարծուկ:պարծուկ
ջլախտաւոր:ջլախտաւոր
ջոջ:ջոջ
սեղանաբոյծ:սեղանաբոյծ
սեղանակապուտ:սեղանակապուտ
սեւամաղձոտ:սեւամաղձոտ
սիգաճեմ:սիգաճեմ
սպառիչ:սպառիչ
սօս:սօս
վիճակակից:վիճակակից
տիպարական:տիպարական
ցեղակից:ցեղակից
ցնցոտի:ցնցոտի
փափկասուն:փափկասուն
փոքրաքանակ:փոքրաքանակ
քաղրթեղ:քաղրթեղ
քծնաբան:քծնաբան
քսակ:քսակ
օձալեզու:օձալեզու
օրինազանց:օրինազանց
օրինապահ:օրինապահ
աղերսարկու:աղերսարկու
ապստամբ:ապստամբ
բամբ:բամբ
բանսարկու:բանսարկու
բեւեռացոյց:բեւեռացոյց
բողոքական:բողոքական
գէտ:գէտ
գուշակ:գուշակ
գրաբար:գրաբար
դաւադիր:դաւադիր
դաւակից:դաւակից
եղեռնագործ:եղեռնագործ
ենթակայ:ենթակայ
եպիկուրեան:եպիկուրեան
էգ:էգ
ընդծովեայ:ընդծովեայ
թշնամի:թշնամի
թուլատարր:թուլատարր
ժանտագործ:ժանտագործ
իմաստասէր:իմաստասէր
իրապաշտ:իրապաշտ
լուղորդ:լուղորդ
խուժանավար:խուժանավար
ծեր:ծեր
կենակից:կենակից
կուրտ:կուրտ
կռապաշտ:կռապաշտ
համակրօն:համակրօն
հարսնացու:հարսնացու
հացկատակ:հացկատակ
ճարտուկ:ճարտուկ
մտաւորական:մտաւորական
մրցակից:մրցակից
յառաջապահ:յառաջապահ
յոռետես:յոռետես
նուիրատու:նուիրատու
շահակից:շահակից
շաղակրատ:շաղակրատ
պանդուխտ:պանդուխտ
պաշտպանեալ:պաշտպանեալ
պառաւ:պառաւ
պատենաթեւ:պատենաթեւ
սեղանաբեկ:սեղանաբեկ
վրանաբնակ:վրանաբնակ
տաճարակապուտ:տաճարակապուտ
տասնեակ:տասնեակ
տարապարհակ:տարապարհակ
տիպար:տիպար
տղայ:տղայ
տնտեսագէտ:տնտեսագէտ
փաղանուն:փաղանուն
քրոնիկ:քրոնիկ
ախորժակաբեր:ախորժակաբեր
աղետալի:աղետալի
ամպածրար:ամպածրար
այլամերժ:այլամերժ
անարդիլ:անարդիլ
անբարեկիրթ:անբարեկիրթ
անբարոյ:անբարոյ
անբնականոն:անբնականոն
անդաւաճան:անդաւաճան
անմեղադիր:անմեղադիր
անողնայար:անողնայար
անպարագրելի:անպարագրելի
անջիղ:անջիղ
անտրամաբանական:անտրամաբանական
աշտճակեր:աշտճակեր
ասմազուն:ասմազուն
ատամնախոռ:ատամնախոռ
ատելավառ:ատելավառ
արհիապատիւ:արհիապատիւ
արնտէր:արնտէր
բազմատանջ:բազմատանջ
բախտակից:բախտակից
բախտորոշ:բախտորոշ
բանագիւտ:բանագիւտ
բարեհաճ:բարեհաճ
բարոյազուրկ:բարոյազուրկ
բացայայտեալ:բացայայտեալ
բացօդեայ:բացօդեայ
բովանդակալից:բովանդակալից
բութածայր:բութածայր
բռշոպ:բռշոպ
գգուական:գգուական
գնահատելի:գնահատելի
դալարագեղ:դալարագեղ
դեղեղ:դեղեղ
դերեւ:դերեւ
դիմակազերծ:դիմակազերծ
դիւրափշուր:դիւրափշուր
երազկոտ:երազկոտ
երախտաւորեալ:երախտաւորեալ
երկարապատում:երկարապատում
զանգուածեղ:զանգուածեղ
զանցառելի:զանցառելի
զուգաթի:զուգաթի
զուգահարթ:զուգահարթ
ընթեռնլի:ընթեռնլի
թանձրաշուրթ:թանձրաշուրթ
թաւշային:թաւշային
թաքնամիտ:թաքնամիտ
թեթեւանկատ:թեթեւանկատ
թնճկոտ:թնճկոտ
թոլոլ:թոլոլ
թոմպուլիկ:թոմպուլիկ
թուլատու:թուլատու
ժայռապինդ:ժայռապինդ
ինքնագով:ինքնագով
ինքնահոս:ինքնահոս
լկուկ:լկուկ
խառնագոյն:խառնագոյն
խաւարչուտ:խաւարչուտ
խլուրդային:խլուրդային
խոտելի:խոտելի
խորշելի:խորշելի
խստերախ:խստերախ
ծանրալուր:ծանրալուր
ծանրակեր:ծանրակեր
ծնգոտ:ծնգոտ
կանխահոգ:կանխահոգ
կանխարգել:կանխարգել
կանխորոշ:կանխորոշ
կարակնազեւ:կարակնազեւ
կարծեկից:կարծեկից
կարճակեաց:կարճակեաց
կեղոտ:կեղոտ
կթու:կթու
կիսարթուն:կիսարթուն
կիսաւարտ:կիսաւարտ
կիսաւեր:կիսաւեր
կիսեփ:կիսեփ
կորստսկսն:կորստսկսն
կտցահար:կտցահար
կրօնափոխ:կրօնափոխ
կցայօն:կցայօն
համայնական:համայնական
համատի:համատի
հասարակորդական:հասարակորդական
հասու:հասու
հաստաշուրթ:հաստաշուրթ
հաստապռունկ:հաստապռունկ
հեղձուկ:հեղձուկ
հեշտակեաց:հեշտակեաց
հիասթափ:հիասթափ
հմայիչ:հմայիչ
հպելի:հպելի
ձեռնթափ:ձեռնթափ
ճայրոտ:ճայրոտ
ճղակոտոր:ճղակոտոր
ճոռամաբան:ճոռամաբան
մարդահասակ:մարդահասակ
մեծաշուրթ:մեծաշուրթ
մեծարժեք:մեծարժեք
մեղուաջան:մեղուաջան
մռթեղ:մռթեղ
յառաջւկայ:յառաջւկայ
յոգնաջան:յոգնաջան
յորդաբուխ:յորդաբուխ
յուսադրական:յուսադրական
նախադատ:նախադատ
նախապաշար:նախապաշար
նախապատրաստական:նախապատրաստական
ներերակային:ներերակային
ներմկանային:ներմկանային
շարմաղուն:շարմաղուն
շփթիկ:շփթիկ
որկրաժէտ:որկրաժէտ
որտեւէգ:որտեւէգ
ուտան:ուտան
չարխափան:չարխափան
պայլանկ:պայլանկ
պայծառատես:պայծառատես
պատարուն:պատարուն
պատեղւոր:պատեղւոր
պատրանաթափ:պատրանաթափ
պարտազերծ:պարտազերծ
պորոմիչ:պորոմիչ
ջաջուռ:ջաջուռ
ջլատիչ:ջլատիչ
ջրամոյն:ջրամոյն
սակաւահեր:սակաւահեր
սասանեցուցիչ:սասանեցուցիչ
սպրկիկ:սպրկիկ
վերանցական:վերանցական
վտառուտ:վտառուտ
վրդովալից:վրդովալից
տկլոզ:տկլոզ
տպաւորական:տպաւորական
ցածուկ:ցածուկ
ցօղաթուրմ:ցօղաթուրմ
փայփայիչ:փայփայիչ
փափաքելի:փափաքելի
քեղիկոնաձեւ:քեղիկոնաձեւ
քճքճուն:քճքճուն
քրձազգեաց:քրձազգեաց
օգտապաշտ:օգտապաշտ
օտարամուտ:օտարամուտ
երկկողմանի:երկկողմանի
գառնազգեստ:գառնազգեստ
դատարկաբան:դատարկաբան
ընդվայրացած:ընդվայրացած
խաչապսշտ:խաչապսշտ
հազարամեայ:հազարամեայ
համայնաբուժ:համայնաբուժ
հելլեն:հելլեն
որթոտոքս:որթոտոքս
պչրանոյշ:պչրանոյշ
սորաբնակ:սորաբնակ
տարեկից:տարեկից
ցորեկօթիկ:ցորեկօթիկ

LEXICON AdvReg
երկկողմանի:երկկողմանի
ապահովաբար:ապահովաբար
գրկաբաց:գրկաբաց
թոպամահ:թոպամահ
կտտամահ:կտտամահ
հեւասպառ:հեւասպառ
ձեռամբարձ:ձեռամբարձ
մագիստրոսաբար:մագիստրոսաբար
յափսիթերս:յափսիթերս
ֆիզիգապէս:ֆիզիգապէս
ամբողջ:ամբողջ
աղէկ:աղէկ
գէշ:գէշ
հոլանի:հոլանի
ամօթապարտ:ամօթապարտ
անայլայլ:անայլայլ
բոլորակի:բոլորակի
անդրդուելի:անդրդուելի
յանկարծամահ:յանկարծամահ
քառատրոփ:քառատրոփ
անթերի:անթերի
անձանձիր:անձանձիր
ակնկառոյց:ակնկառոյց
աներկբայ:աներկբայ
դիւրին:դիւրին
ամէն:ամէն
աներկեւան:աներկեւան
անմահ:անմահ
հեղ:հեղ
վար:վար
աներկմիտ:աներկմիտ
անխափան:անխափան
անխոտոր:անխոտոր
անհաղորդ:անհաղորդ
անմասն:անմասն
գետնամած:գետնամած
թաւալգլոր:թաւալգլոր
ժիրաժիր:ժիրաժիր
լիաբուռն:լիաբուռն
լիուլի:լիուլի
կոշկոճամահ:կոշկոճամահ
մազապուր:մազապուր
մինակ:մինակ
մտադիւր:մտադիւր
յաւէրժ:յաւէրժ
ումպէտ:ումպէտ
ուսամբարձ:ուսամբարձ
սիրայօժար:սիրայօժար
սրտայօժար:սրտայօժար
վշտագին:վշտագին
անմեղ:անմեղ
անմոլար:անմոլար
անչափ:անչափ
անսայթաք:անսայթաք
անսասան:անսասան
անտարբեր:անտարբեր
ապաժամ:ապաժամ
ատակ:ատակ
արդարացի:արդարացի
բացարձակ:բացարձակ
բացօթեայ:բացօթեայ
բնաջինջ:բնաջինջ
բոկոտն:բոկոտն
բոպիկ:բոպիկ
զուր:զուր
զուրկ:զուրկ
ընդունայն:ընդունայն
թաքթաքուր:թաքթաքուր
կշտապինդ:կշտապինդ
կոկորդալիր:կոկորդալիր
կորագլուխ:կորագլուխ
կորակոր:կորակոր
կսկծագին:կսկծագին
համախորհուրդ:համախորհուրդ
հաստատ:հաստատ
հարեւանցի:հարեւանցի
հուսկ:հուսկ
ճակատաբաց:ճակատաբաց
միահեծան:միահեծան
յարատեւ:յարատեւ
յորդառատ:յորդառատ
նստուկ:նստուկ
շնչասպառ:շնչասպառ
ողբագին:ողբագին
որոտընդոստ:որոտընդոստ
ունայնաձեռն:ունայնաձեռն
պաղատագին:պաղատագին
ցանուցիր:ցանուցիր
ցիրուցան:ցիրուցան
